Washington statutes.
RCW 10.46.020

Trial docket.

The clerk shall, in preparing the docket of criminal cases, enumerate the indictments and informations pending according to the date of their filing, specifying opposite to the title of each action whether it be for a felony or misdemeanor, and whether the defendant be in custody or on bail; and shall, in like manner, enter therein all indictments and informations on which issues of fact are joined, all cases brought to the court on change of venue from other counties, and all cases pending upon appeal from inferior courts.

[ 1891 c 28 s 65; Code 1881 s 1044; 1873 p 231 s 222; 1854 p 115 s 86; RRS s 2134.]